District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-205.02

Authorization of appropriations.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 813, Pub. L. 93-198, title V, § 502
Aug. 29, 1994, 88 Stat. 793, Pub. L. 93-395, § 1(7)
Aug. 6, 1981, 95 Stat. 150, Pub. L. 97-30
Oct. 15, 1982, 96 Stat. 1626, Pub L. 97-34
Aug. 2, 1983, 97 Stat. 367, Pub. L. 98-65
June 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 98-316
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 9(c)(2)
Dec. 12, 1989, 103 Stat. 1901, Pub. L. 101-223, § 2(a)
Aug. 17, 1991, 105 Stat. 495, Pub. L. 102-102, § 2(a)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777. Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(a)(1)